Utah statutes.
36-14-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Issuer" means a person authorized to issue a subpoena by this chapter.

(2)  "Legislative body" means the Legislature, any committee of the Legislature, the House of Representatives, and the Senate.

(3)  "Legislative office" means the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel, Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, and the Office of the Legislative Auditor General.

(4)  "Legislative subpoena" means a subpoena issued by an issuer and includes:

(a)  a subpoena requiring a person to appear and testify before some legislative body or office;

(b)  a subpoena requiring a person to:

(i)  appear and testify before some legislative body or legislative office; and

(ii)  produce accounts, books, papers, documents, or other tangible things designated in the subpoena; and

(c)  a subpoena requiring a person to produce accounts, books, papers, documents, or other tangible things designated in the subpoena at a time and place designated in the subpoena.

